Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5031.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-7-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-7 entitled "Retail Licenses"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-7-19. Objection by adjoining property owners — Proximity to schools and
churches.
(a) Retailers’ Class B, C, N and I licenses, and any license provided for in § 3-7-16.8, shall
not be issued to authorize the sale of beverages in any building where the owner of the greater part
of the land within two hundred feet (200′) of any point of the building files with the body or official
having jurisdiction to grant licenses his or her objection to the granting of the license, nor in any
building within two hundred feet (200′) of the premises of any public, private, or parochial school
or a place of public worship. In the city of East Providence, retailer’s Class A licenses shall not be
issued to authorize the sale of beverages in any building within five hundred feet (500′) of the
premises of any public, private, or parochial school, or a place of public worship.
(b) As used in this section, “private school” means any nonpublic institution of elementary
or secondary (K-12th grade) education, accredited or recognized as a private school by the
department of elementary and secondary education or the school committee of the city or town
having jurisdiction over private schools.
(c) This section shall not apply to any Class B or C license holder whose license was issued
prior to January 1, 1978, nor shall this section apply to, or constitute the basis of, an objection to,
or disapproval of, the transfer of a Class B or C license where the location of the licensed

establishment predates the location of the public, private, or parochial school, or place of public
worship.
(d)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within the following described
area(s) in the city of Providence:
(A) Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the southerly line of Smith
Street and the easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95;
Thence running in a general southwesterly direction along the easterly taking line of
Interstate Route 95 to the center line of Kingsley Avenue;
Thence turning and running northwesterly in part along the southerly line of Kingsley
Avenue to its intersection with the southerly line of Harris Avenue;
Thence turning and running westerly along the southerly line of Harris Avenue to its
intersection with the southerly line of Atwells Avenue;
Thence turning and running easterly along the southerly line of Atwells Avenue to the
easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95;
Thence turning and running in a general southerly and southeasterly direction along the
easterly taking line of Interstate Route 95 to the center line of Pine Street;
Thence turning and running northeasterly along the northerly taking line of I-195 to its
intersection with the northerly taking line of I-195;
Thence turning and running northeasterly along the northerly taking line of I-195 to its
intersection with the westerly shore line of the Providence River;
Thence turning and running northerly along the westerly shore line of the Providence River
to its intersection with the southerly line of Crawford Street;
Thence running northwesterly across Dyer Street to the intersection of the westerly line of
Dyer Street to the southerly line of Custom House Street;
Thence running northerly in part along the southerly line of Dyer Street and in part along
the westerly line of Market Square to its intersection with the westerly line of Canal Street;
Thence turning and running northerly along the westerly line of Canal Street to its
intersection with the southerly line of Smith Street;
Thence turning and running westerly along the southerly line of Smith Street to the point
and place of beginning.
(B) Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the westerly line of Brook
Street and the northerly line of Wickenden Street;
LC000435 - Page 2 of 13

Thence running in a general westerly direction along the northerly line of Wickenden Street
to the intersection of Wickenden Street and Benefit Street;
Thence running in a general northerly direction along the easterly line of Benefit Street to
the intersection of Benefit Street and Sheldon Street;
Thence turning and running in an easterly direction along the southerly line of Sheldon
Street to the intersection of Sheldon Street and Brook Street;
Thence turning and running in a general southerly line to the intersection of Brook Street
and Wickenden Street that being the point of beginning.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Newport shall, after application, have authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located within the following described area in the
city of Newport:
Beginning at a point, that point being the intersection of the southerly line of Broadway
and the easterly line of Courthouse Square;
Thence running in a general northeasterly direction along the southerly line of Broadway
a distance of one hundred and two feet (102′) to a point at the southeasterly corner of land now or
formerly owned by the Newport Historical Society;
Thence turning and running in a southeasterly direction ninety-eight and nine-tenths feet
(98.9′) along the southwesterly border of land now or formerly owned by the Newport Historical
Society;
Thence turning and running in a southwesterly direction one hundred and twelve feet (112′)
to Courthouse Street; and
Thence turning and running in a generally northwesterly direction along Courthouse Street
for a distance of ninety feet (90′) to the point and place of beginning.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Warren shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within any zoning district in the
town of Warren which is designated as a limited business district or as a general business district
pursuant to the zoning ordinance of the town of Warren.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Bristol shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on lot 34 of tax assessors plat 10 of the
Bristol tax assessors map as of December 31, 1999, including that portion of the public sidewalk
contiguous to said lot.
LC000435 - Page 3 of 13

(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses for the city of
Newport shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section as
to places of public worship any proposed sidewalk cafe as defined in the Codified Ordinance of the
city of Newport, provided that the applicant be an existing holder of a Retailers’ Class B license.
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on lot 131 of tax assessors plat 68 of
the Providence tax assessors map as of December 31, 1999, and any proposed retailer Class B
license intended to be located on lot 21 of the tax assessors map plat 49 and any proposed retailer
class BV license intended to be located on lots 3 and 5 of tax assessors map plat 35 of the
Providence tax assessors map as of December 31, 2003.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on either lot 160 of tax assessor’s plat
9, and/or on lot 152 of tax assessor’s plat 9, of the Cranston tax assessor’s map as of December 31,
2002; provided, however, as to the subsequent transfer of said Class B license issued by the city of
Cranston under this exemption, whether said transfer is attributable to the holder’s death or
otherwise, any person desiring to become the potential transferee of said Class B license shall
comply with those restrictions as to its use (and shall refrain from those activities which result in
its reversion) set forth in the city of Cranston Memorandum of Understanding dated May 13, 2003,
and, in addition, those requirements applicable to anyone who desires to become a transferee of a
validly issued and outstanding Class B license designated for use in any location in the state of
Rhode Island. Neither the exemption granted herein nor any future exemption granted hereafter
shall be effective until the proposed Class B license and the underlying property owner is certified
to be current in the payment of any and all local and state taxes.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Pawtucket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B, C, or I license intended to be located within the following described
area in the city of Pawtucket:
Beginning at the point of intersection of Dexter Street and the Central Falls line, then east
along the Central Falls line to the Blackstone River, then north along the city boundary on the
Blackstone River to the Cumberland line, then west along the Pawtucket city boundary line to I-
95, then south along I-95 to Pine Street, then north on Pine Street to AMTRAK Right of Way, then
northwest along the AMTRAK Right of Way to Dexter Street, then north on Dexter Street to the
LC000435 - Page 4 of 13

Central Falls line.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of Little
Compton, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section relating to
places of worship any class B license limited to malt and vinous beverages intended to be located
on Plat 30, Lot 33 of the town of Little Compton tax assessment map existing as of December 31,
2004.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Bristol shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located on lots 3, 18, and 19 of tax assessors plat
10 of the Bristol tax assessors map as of December 31, 2007.
(11) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Smithfield, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any class
B, C, or I license intended to be located on Plat 45, Lot 042 of the town of Smithfield, tax
assessment map existing as of December 31, 2007; provided, however, said exemption shall apply
only to any renewal of any class B, C, or I license issued for use at the said premises located on
plat 45, lot 042 as of December 31, 2011. In the event said license is not renewed, then this
exemption is hereby repealed in its entirety.
(12) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located on plat 13, lots 31 and 32 of the
applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Tiverton shall, after the application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
a proposed retailer’s Class BV license for a restaurant located on tax assessor’s plat 181, lot 1A.
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 68, lot 732.
(15) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 105, lot 489, plat 105, lot 12
and plat 32, lot 232 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(16) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of Central
Falls, shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 5, lot 188 of the applicable city
LC000435 - Page 5 of 13

of Central Falls tax assessment map.
(17) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Portsmouth shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 37, lot 69 of the applicable
town of Portsmouth tax assessment map.
(18) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 23A, lot 98 of the
applicable town of North Providence tax assessment map.
(19) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 11, lot 3558 of the applicable
city of Cranston tax assessment map.
(20) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Smithfield, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any Class
B or C license intended to be located on Plat 6, Lot 54 of the town of Smithfield tax assessors map
as of December 31, 2012.
(21) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Cranston shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers class B license intended to be located on tax assessors plat 1, lot 2170 of the
applicable city of Cranston tax assessment map as of December 31, 2012.
(22) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 43, lot 211.
(23) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 22A, Lot 336, of the
applicable town of North Providence tax assessment map.
(24) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of Central
Falls shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on plat 1, lot 164 of the applicable city
of Central Falls tax assessment map.
(25) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
LC000435 - Page 6 of 13

any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 1948-1950 Westminster Street on
plat 35, lot 359 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(26) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Middletown, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any
proposed retailer’s Class BV license intended to be located on Plat 107 NW, Lot 55 of the town of
Middletown’s tax assessor’s maps as of December 31, 2014.
(27) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any retailer Class B, C or I license intended to be located on Plat 109, Lot 289, of the applicable
city of Providence tax assessor’s map.
(28) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class BV license intended to be located at 226 and 230 Dean Street on plat
25, lot 44 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(29) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
East Greenwich shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 219 Main Street on map/lot
085 001 212 0000 of the applicable town of East Greenwich tax assessment map.
(30) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
East Greenwich shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 137 Main Street on map/lot
085-001-412; 59 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-236; 555 Main Street on map/lot 075-003-084;
74 Cliff Street on map/lot 075-003-040; 609 Main Street on map/lot 075-003-080; 241 Main Street
on map/lot 085-001-208; 155 Main Street on map/lot 085-001-222; 149 Main Street on map/lot
085-001-223; and 2 Academy Court on map/lot 085-001-211 of the applicable Town of East
Greenwich tax assessment map.
(31) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Lincoln shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s plat 10, lot 108, of the
Lincoln tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2015.
(32) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class C license intended to be located at 215 Dean Street on plat 28, lot 961
of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
LC000435 - Page 7 of 13

(33) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 100-102 Hope Street on plat 16,
lot 263 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(34) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the town of
Cumberland shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 88 Broad Street on Lots 32, 51,
and 52 of Plat 2 Cumberland tax assessor’s map as of December 31, 2016.
(35) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 11 Lowell Avenue, 191 Pocasset
Avenue and 187 Pocasset Avenue on Lots 22, 23, and 24 of Plat 108 Providence tax assessor’s map
as of December 31, 2017.
(36) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council in the city of Central
Falls shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on Plat 1, of Lot 171 of the applicable
city of Central Falls tax assessment map.
(37) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class BV and Class BX license intended to be located at 161 Douglas
Avenue on plat 68, lot 201 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(38) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 1007 Broad Street, Plat 53, Lot
192 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map and 1017 Broad Street Plat 53, Lot
582 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(39) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council in the city of
Woonsocket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 122 North Main Street, Map/Lot
130-125-005 of the applicable city of Woonsocket tax assessment map.
(40) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of
Woonsocket, after application, is authorized to exempt from the provisions of this section, any
proposed retailers’ license of any class intended to be located within the Downtown Overlay
District.
LC000435 - Page 8 of 13

(41) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 375 Smith Street, Plat 68, Lot 132
of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(42) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 671 Broadway Street, Plat 35, Lot
566 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(43) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 464-468 Wickenden Street, also
identified as 8 Governor Street, Plat 17, Lot 179 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment
map.
(44) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 114 Granite Street, Westerly, RI
02891, Plat 67, Lot 278 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.
(45) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the city of
Woonsocket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 43 Railroad Street, Plat 14R, Lot
205 of the applicable city of Woonsocket tax assessment map.
(46) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BL license or Class BV license intended to be located at 601 Hartford
Avenue, Plat 113, Lot 50 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(47) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 169 and 177 Main Street, Westerly,
RI 02891, Map 66, Lots 8 and 9 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.
(48) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the city council of the city of East
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 332 Bullock Point Avenue, East
Providence, RI 02915, Map 312, Block 12, Parcel 018.00 of the applicable city of East Providence
tax assessment map.
LC000435 - Page 9 of 13

(49) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of license commissioners of
the city of Pawtucket shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of
this section any proposed retailers Class B, C, or N license intended to be located on Plat 54B, Lots
826 and 827; Plat 65B, Lot 662; and Plat 23A, Lots 599, 672, and 673 of the city of Pawtucket tax
assessment map existing as of March 1, 2021.
(50) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses in the town of
Jamestown, after application, has the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class BVL license intended to be located at 53 Narragansett Avenue, Plat 9, Lot
207 of the applicable town of Jamestown tax assessment map.
(51) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence, shall after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BV and Class P license intended to be located at 203-209 Douglas
Avenue, Plat 68, Lots 83 and 646 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(52) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of East
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 130 Taunton Avenue, Map 106,
Block 6, Parcel 15 of the applicable city of East Providence tax assessment map.
(53) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Barrington shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 305 Sowams Road, Barrington,
R.I. 02806, Plat 30, Lot 141 of the applicable town of Barrington tax assessment map.
(54) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 737 Hope Street, Plat 6, Lot 595 of
the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(55) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Warren shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 4 Market Street, Plat 3, Lot 74 of the
applicable town of Warren tax assessment map.
(56) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the town council of the town of
Westerly shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailers’ Class B license intended to be located at 163 Main Street, Westerly, RI
02891, Map 66, Lot 11 of the applicable town of Westerly tax assessment map.
(57) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
LC000435 - Page 10 of 13

Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BL license intended to be located at 777 Elmwood Avenue, Plat 60,
Lot 1 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(58) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
North Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section, any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located on tax assessor’s Plat 19, Lot
617.
(59) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B license intended to be located at 12 Governor Street, Plat 17, Lot 180
of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(60) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B or Class BV licenses intended to be located at 371 Smith Street, Plat
68, Lot 2 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(61) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
Bristol shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section any
proposed retailer Class B or Class BV licenses intended to be located at 499 Hope Street, Map 9,
Lot 75 of the applicable town of Bristol tax assessment map.
(62) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the town of
South Kingstown shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this
section any proposed retailer’s Class BV license intended to be located at 357 Main Street, a/k/a
359 Main Street, Plat 56-3, Lot 50, of the applicable town of South Kingstown tax assessment map.
(63) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B or Class BV licenses intended to be located at 225 Waterman Street,
Plat 14, Lot 508 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(64) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of East
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer’s Class B license intended to be located at 136 Taunton Avenue, Map 106,
Block 6, Parcel 15 of the applicable city of East Providence tax assessment map.
(65) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BL license or Class BV license intended to be located at 566 Plainfield
LC000435 - Page 11 of 13

Street, Plat 108, Lot 55 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(66) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BL license or Class BV license intended to be located at 777 Elmwood
Avenue, Plat 060, Lot 0001 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(67) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BV license intended to be located at 94 Carpenter Street on Plat 29, lot
278 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(68) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class B or Class BV license intended to be located at 79 Ives Street, Plat 017,
Lot 487 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(69) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BV license intended to be located at 1230 Elmwood Avenue, Plat 089,
Lot 210 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(70) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BV license intended to be located at 94 Carpenter Street on Plat 29, Lot
278 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
(71) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the board of licenses of the city of
Providence shall, after application, have the authority to exempt from the provisions of this section
any proposed retailer Class BV license intended to be located at 1023 Broad Street, Plat 53, Lot
620 of the applicable city of Providence tax assessment map.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000435
========
LC000435 - Page 12 of 13